Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1209
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-1201 to 48-1209 shall be known and may be cited as the Wage and Hour Act.

Laws 1967, c. 285, § 9, p. 776;

Laws 1991, LB 297, § 4.